Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2453.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 10-122, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE10-122. Filing, service and copying fees; expedited report filing and access; same day and next day services; posted wait times; advance monies; definition A. The commission shall collect and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the following nonrefundable fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the commission: Document                                      Fee 1. Articles of incorporation                         $50 2. Application for use of indistinguishable name      10 3. Application for reserved name                      10 4. Notice of transfer of reserved name                10 5. Application for registered name                    10 6. Application for renewal of registered name         10 7. Agent's statement of resignation                   10 8. Amendment of articles of incorporation             25 9. Restatement of articles of incorporation with amendment of articles                            25 10. Statement of merger, interest exchange, conversion, domestication or division if the entity responsible for filing the statement is a corporation                                100 11. Articles of dissolution                           25 12. Articles of revocation of dissolution             25 13. Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, in addition to other fees and penalties due                 100 14. Application for authority                        150 15. Application for withdrawal                        25 16. Annual report                                     45 17. Articles of correction                            25 18. Application for certificate of good standing      10 19. Any other document required or permitted to be filed by chapters 1 through 17 of this title                                    25 B. The commission shall collect a nonrefundable fee of twenty-five dollars $25 each time process is served on it under chapters 1 through 17 of this title. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding. C. The commission shall charge and collect a reasonable fee for copying documents on request, provided the fee does not exceed the cost of providing the service as determined by the commission. The commission shall also charge a reasonable fee for certifying the copy of a filed document, provided the fee does not exceed the cost of providing the service as determined by the commission. D. A penalty of one hundred dollars $100 that is payable in addition to other fees accrues and is payable if a foreign corporation fails to file an amendment, restated articles that include an amendment,  or articles of merger within sixty days after the time of filing in the jurisdiction in which the corporation is domiciled.  The penalty collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. E. One-third of the fees for the annual report of domestic and foreign corporations paid pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 16 of this section shall be deposited in the Arizona arts trust fund established by section 41-983.01 and two-thirds of these fees shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the public access fund established by section 10-122.01. F. The commission shall provide for and establish an expedited service for the filing of all documents and services provided pursuant to this title as follows: 1. The expedited filing shall be a priority service to be completed as soon as possible after the documents are delivered to the commission. 2. In addition to any other fees required by this section or any other law, the commission shall charge a nonrefundable fee for expedited services, including those requested by fax. The fee shall be determined by a supermajority vote of the commissioners. 3. The commission may provide for and establish same day and next day services for the filing of any documents and services provided pursuant to this title as follows: (a) The commission shall suspend same day or next day service if the commission determines that it does not have the necessary resources to perform the service within the established time period. (b) In addition to any other fees required by this section or any other law, the commissioners may charge a nonrefundable fee for the same day or next day service or both.  The fee shall be determined by a supermajority vote of the commissioners. 4. The commission shall publicly post the current wait times for processing regular, expedited and same day and next day services. G. The commission may charge persons who access the commission's data processing system that is maintained pursuant to section 10-122.01 from remote locations and persons requesting special computer generated printouts, reports and tapes a reasonable fee that does not exceed the cost of the time, equipment and personnel necessary to provide this service or product as determined by the commission. H. Except as provided in section 10-122.01, subsection B  c, paragraph 3, in addition to any fee charged pursuant to this section, the commission may charge and collect the following nonrefundable fees to help defray the cost of the improved data processing system that is maintained pursuant to section 10-122.01: 1. Filing articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation, ten dollars $10. 2. Filing an application of a foreign corporation for authority to transact business in this state, twenty-five dollars $25. I. All monies received pursuant to subsections F, G and H of this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the public access fund established by section 10-122.01. J. Fees charged pursuant to this section are exempt from section 39-121.03, subsection A, paragraph 3. K. The commission may allow any person to advance monies to the commission to pay fees required pursuant to this section for future filings and services. All monies received pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the money on deposit account in the public access fund established by section 10-122.01. L. In addition to any other fees prescribed by law, the commission may establish a fee for the filing of an annual benefit report delivered to the commission pursuant to section 10-2442. The fee shall be determined by a majority vote of the commissioners. M. For the purposes of this section, "supermajority" means an affirmative vote of at least four commissioners. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 10-122.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE10-122.01. Public access fund; purpose; exemption; money on deposit account A. The public access fund is established. The commission shall administer the fund.  The fund consists of monies received pursuant to: 1. Section 10-122, subsections E, F, G, H and K. 2. Section 10-3122, subsections I and K. 3. Section 29-3213, subsections E and F. B. the commission shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, One-third of all of the monies that are collected pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section in the arizona arts trust fund established by section 41-983.01. B. C. Except as provided in subsection C  D of this section: 1. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation. 2. The commission shall spend monies in the fund for a part of the general administrative and legal expenses of the commission and to purchase, install and maintain an improved data processing system on the premises of the commission.  The data processing system shall be designed to allow direct online access by any person at a remote location to all public records that are filed with the commission pursuant to this title and title 29 relating to limited liability companies. 3. When sufficient monies have been collected pursuant to section 10-122, subsections F, G and H and section 10-3122, subsection I to pay for the purchase and installation of the data processing system, the commission shall not charge and collect the fees prescribed in section 10-122, subsection H or section 10-3122, subsection H. 4. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations, except that any unencumbered monies in excess of $200,000 at the end of each fiscal year revert to the state general fund. C. D. The money on deposit account is established in the public access fund as a separate account consisting of monies received pursuant to section 10-122, subsection K, section 10-3122, subsection K, section 29-851, subsection F and section 29-3213, subsection F. Monies in the money on deposit account: 1. Are held in trust by the commission. 2. May be withdrawn by the commission only: (a) To cover fees that are due pursuant to this title or title 29 relating to limited liability companies on delivery of documents for filing or on a request for services by a person who advanced monies to the commission pursuant to section 10-122, subsection K, section 10-3122, subsection K, section 29-851, subsection F or section 29-3213, subsection F. (b) To refund the monies advanced in subdivision (a) of this paragraph if the person who requested services pursuant to subdivision (a) of this paragraph requests the refund. (c) For the disposition of unclaimed property pursuant to title 44, chapter 3. 3. Are not subject to either: (a) Legislative appropriation. (b) Reversion to the state general fund. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 10-3122, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE10-3122. Filing, service and copying fees; public access fund; expedited report filing and access; same day and next day services A. The commission shall collect and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund the following nonrefundable fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the commission for filing or issuance: Document                                      Fee 1. Articles of incorporation                         $ 30 2. Application for use of indistinguishable name     $ 10 3. Application for reserved name                     $ 10 4. Notice of transfer of reserved name               $ 10 5. Application for registered name                   $ 10 6. Application for renewal of registered name        $ 10 7. Agent's statement of resignation                  $ 10 8. Amendment of articles of incorporation            $ 25 9. Restatement of articles of incorporation with amendment of articles                      $ 25 10. Statement of merger, interest exchange, conversion, domestication or division if the entity responsible for filing the statement is a nonprofit corporation            $100 11. Articles of dissolution                          $ 25 12. Articles of revocation of dissolution            $ 25 13. Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution or revocation, in addition to other fees and penalties due     $ 25 14. Application for authority                        $150 15. Application for withdrawal                       $ 25 16. Annual report                                    $ 10 17. Articles of correction                           $ 25 18. Application for certificate of good standing     $ 10 B. The commission shall collect a nonrefundable fee of twenty-five dollars $25 each time process is served on it under chapters 24 through 42 of this title. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding. The fee collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. C. The commission shall charge and collect fifty cents per page for copying documents on request.  The commission shall also charge five dollars $5 plus fifty cents $.50 per page for certifying the copy of a filed document. The fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. D. A penalty of one hundred dollars $100 that is payable in addition to other fees accrues and is payable if a foreign corporation fails to file an amendment, restated articles that include an amendment,  or articles of merger within sixty days of after the time of filing in the jurisdiction in which the corporation is domiciled. The penalty collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. E. Pursuant to section 10-122, subsection F, the commission shall provide for and establish an expedited service for the filing of all documents and services provided pursuant to chapters 24 through 42 of this title. F. Pursuant to section 10-122, subsection F, the commission may provide for and establish same day and next day services for the filing of any documents and services provided pursuant to chapters 24 through 42 of this title. G. The commission may charge persons who access the commission's data processing system that is maintained pursuant to section 10-122.01 from remote locations and persons requesting special computer generated printouts, reports and tapes a reasonable fee that does not exceed the cost of the time, equipment and personnel necessary to provide this service or product as determined by the commission. H. Except as provided in section 10-122.01, subsection B  c, paragraph 3, in addition to any fee charged pursuant to this section, the commission may charge and collect the following nonrefundable fees to help defray the cost of the improved data processing system that is maintained pursuant to section 10-122.01: 1. Filing articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation, ten dollars $10. 2. Filing an application of a foreign corporation for authority to transact business in this state, twenty-five dollars $25. I. All monies received pursuant to subsections E through H of this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the public access fund established by section 10-122.01. J. Fees charged pursuant to this section are exempt from section 39-121.03, subsection A, paragraph 3. K. Any person may advance monies to the commission to pay fees required pursuant to this section for future filings and services. All monies received pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the money on deposit account in the public access fund established by section 10-122.01. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 41-983.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-983.01. Arizona arts trust fund A. There is established The Arizona arts trust fund is established. The trust fund shall be administered by the Arizona commission on the arts and shall consist of revenues derived from filing fees collected pursuant to section 10-122 and deposited made pursuant to section 10-122.01. The commission shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, such revenues into the trust fund at least quarterly. B. On notice from the commission, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the trust fund. Monies in the fund shall not revert to the state general fund. C. Expenditures from the trust fund for grants under the Arizona arts program shall be authorized by a majority vote of the commission.  All other expenditures may be authorized by the chairman of the commission.  Expenditures shall be made upon on warrants drawn by the department of administration. END_STATUTE